Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB55.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 403.100 is amended to read as follows:
In any court proceeding conducted pursuant to KRS 403.010 to 403.350, [if the
respondent is incarcerated for a conviction pursuant to KRS Chapter 507, 508, 509, or
510, where the petitioner is the victim, ]the guardian ad litem shall be paid a reasonable
fee to be fixed by the court and paid by the Finance and Administration Cabinet if:
(1) The respondent is incarcerated for a conviction pursuant to KRS Chapter 507,
508, 509, or 510 and the petitioner is the victim of the offense; or
(2) The respondent and petitioner have an active order of protection and both parties
qualify as an indigent person as defined in KRS 31.100.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 9/3/2024 1:48 PM Jacketed